tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Sörf > Sörf Tahtaları: Fish sörf tahtaları; Foil sörf tahtaları; Funboard sörf tahtaları; Gun sörf tahtaları; Longboard Sörf Tahtaları; Shortboard Sörf Tahtaları; Ayakta Kürek Çekme Tahtaları; Dalga Kayakları
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Surf (sport) > Tavole da surf: Tavole da surf fish; Tavole da foil; Tavole da surf funboard; Tavole da surf gun; Tavole da surf longboard; Tavole da surf shortboard; Tavole Stand Up Paddle; Waveskis
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Surfing > Deski surfingowe: Deski surfingowe typu Fish; Deski typu Foil; Deski surfingowe typu Funboard; Deski surfingowe typu Gun; Deski surfingowe długie; Deski surfingowe krótkie; Deski SUP; Deski do surfingu z wiosłem
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > サーフィン > サーフボード: フィッシュサーフボード; フォイルボード; ファンボード; ガンサーフボード; ロングボード サーフボード; ショートボード サーフボード; スタンドアップパドルボード; ウェーブスキー
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Серфинг > Доски для серфинга: Серфборды типа Fish; Фойлборды; Серфборды типа Funboard; Серфборды типа Gun; Лонгборды для серфинга; Шортборды для серфинга; Доски для сапсерфинга; Доски для вейвски-серфинга
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Lướt sóng > Ván lướt sóng: Ván lướt sóng đuôi cá; Ván lướt sóng cánh ngầm; Ván lướt sóng funboard; Ván lướt sóng Gun; Ván lướt sóng dài; Ván lướt sóng ngắn; Ván lướt đứng; Ván trượt sóng
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Surfen > Surfbretter: Fish-Surfboards; Foil-Boards; Funboard-Surfboards; Gun-Surfboards; Longboard-Surfbretter; Shortboard-Surfbretter; Stand-Up-Paddle-Boards; Wave-Skier
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Surffaus > Surffilaudat: Fish-surffilaudat; Foil-laudat; Funboard-surffilaudat; Gun-surffilaudat; Pitkät surffilaudat; Lyhyet surffilaudat; Sup-laudat; Vesilaudat
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Surfing > Surfboards: Fish Surfboards; Foil Boards; Funboard Surfboards; Gun Surfboards; Longboard Surfboards; Shortboard Surfboards; Stand Up Paddle Boards; Waveskis
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Surfanje > Daske za surfanje: Fish daske za surfanje; Hidrokrilne daske za surfanje; Funboard daske za surfanje; Gun daske za surfanje; Longboard daske za surfanje; Shortboard daske za surfanje; SUP daske; Waveski daske
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Surf > Tablas de surf: Tablas de surf fish; Tablas de foil; Tablas de surf funboard; Tablas de surf gun; Tablas de surf longboard; Tablas de surf cortas; Tablas de paddle surf; Esquís para olas
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Surfe > Pranchas de surfe: Pranchas de surf Fish; Pranchas de foil; Pranchas de surf Funboard; Pranchas de surf Gun; Pranchas de surfe longboard; Prancha de surfe; Pranchas de stand up paddle; Waveskis
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Surfing > Plăci de surfing: Plăci de surf tip fish; Plăci de folie; Plăci de surf tip funboard; Plăci de surf tip gun; Plăci de surfing tip longboard; Plăci de surfing tip shortboard; Plăci de surfing tip stand up cu padele; Schiuri de apă
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Σέρφινγκ > Σανίδες σερφ: Σανίδες σερφ fish; Σανίδες foil; Σανίδες σερφ funboard; Σανίδες σερφ gun; Σανίδες μακρού σερφ; Σανίδες κοντού σερφ; Σανίδες Stand Up Paddle; Σανίδες κυμάτων
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Surfing > Surfingbrädor: Fish-surfbrädor; Foilbrädor; Funboard-surfbrädor; Gun-surfbrädor; Longboardsurfbrädor; Shortboardsurfbrädor; Stående paddleboards; Waveskis
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Surf > Planches de surf: Planches de surf fish; Planches de foil; Planches de surf funboard; Planches de surf gun; Planches de surf longboard; Planches de surf shortboard; Planches de stand up paddle; Planches de waveski
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Surfanje > Surf deske: Fish deske za surfanje; Foil deske za surfanje; Funboardi za surfanje; Deske za surfanje za velike valove; Longboardi za surfanje; Shortboardi za surfanje; Deske za veslanje v stoje; Deske za waveski
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Surfing > Surfebrett: Fish-surfebrett; Foilbrett; Funboard-surfebrett; Gun-surfebrett; Longboard-surfebrett; Shortboard-surfebrett; Stand Up Paddle-brett; Waveski
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Surfe > Pranchas de surfe: Pranchas de surf fish; Pranchas de foil; Pranchas de surf funboard; Pranchas de surf gun; Pranchas de surf longboard; Pranchas de surf shortboard; Pranchas de stand up paddle; Waveskis
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 冲浪用品 > 冲浪板: 鱼型冲浪板; 水翼冲浪板; 趣味冲浪板; 枪型冲浪板; 长板冲浪板; 短板冲浪板; 站立式桨板; 滑水板
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Surfovanie > Surfovacie dosky: Surfové dosky v tvare ryby; Fóliové dosky; Surfovacie dosky funboard; Surfovacie dosky; Dlhé surfovacie dosky; Krátke surfovacie dosky; Paddleboardy na státie; Waveski
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Surfing > Surfbrætter: Fish-surfbrætter; Foil-brætter; Funboard-surfbrætter; Gun-surfbrætter; Lange surfbrætter; Korte surfbrætter; Stand up-paddleboards; Waveski
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 서핑 > 서핑보드: 피시 서프보드; 포일 보드; 펀보드 서프보드; 건 서프보드; 롱보드 서핑보드; 숏보드 서핑보드; 스탠드업 패들보드; 웨이브스키
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Szörfözés > Szörfdeszkák: Fish szörfdeszkák; Foil deszkák; Funboard szörfdeszkák; Gun szörfdeszkák; Longboard szörfdeszkák; Shortboard szörfdeszkák; SUP-deszkák; Waveski-k
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Сърфиране > Дъски за сърф: Дъски за сърф тип „риба“; Фойл дъски; Фънборд дъски; Дълги дъски за сърф; Лонгбордове за сърф; Шортбордове за сърф; Стендъп падъл бордове; Дъски за сърф с гребла
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 衝浪 > 衝浪板: 魚型衝浪板; 水翼衝浪板; 趣味衝浪板; 槍型衝浪板; 長板衝浪板; 短板衝浪板; 立式槳板; 趴板
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Banglenčių sportas > Banglentės: „Fish“ tipo banglentės; „Foil“ lentos; Funboard banglentės; „Gun“ tipo banglentės; Ilgosios banglentės; Trumposios banglentės; Stovimosios irklentės; „Waveski“ lentos
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Surfování > Surfová prkna: Fish surfy; Foil boardy; Funboard surfy; Gun surfy; Surfová prkna – longboard; Surfová prkna – shortboard; Surfová prkna – SUP (Stand Up Paddle); Waveski
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Surfen > Surfplanken: Fish-surfplanken; Foilboards; Funboard-surfplanken; Gun-surfplanken; Longboard-surfplanken; Shortboard-surfplanken; Stand-up peddelplanken; Waveski's
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > การเล่นกระดานโต้คลื่น > กระดานโต้คลื่น: กระดานโต้คลื่นทรงฟิช; ฟอยล์บอร์ด; กระดานโต้คลื่นทรงฟันบอร์ด; กระดานโต้คลื่นทรงกัน; กระดานโต้คลื่นแบบยาว; กระดานโต้คลื่นแบบสั้น; กระดานแบบยืนพาย; สกีแบบนั่งพาย